North Carolina statutes. Chapter 108A. Social Services.
Part 6. Medical Assistance Program.
§ 108A-55.4.
Insurers to provide certain information to Department of Health and Human Services.

As used in this section, the terms:

“Applicant” means an applicant or former applicant of medical assistance benefits.

(1a)

“Department” means the Department of Health and Human Services.

“Division” means the Division of Health Benefits of the Department of Health and Human Services.

“Health insurer” includes self-insured plans, group health plans (as defined in section 607(1) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, [29 USC Section 1167(1)]), service benefit plans, managed care organizations, or other parties that are, by statute, contract, or agreement, legally responsible for payment of a claim for a health care item or service as a condition of doing business in the State.

“Medical assistance” means medical assistance benefits provided under the State Medical Assistance Plan.

, (6) Reserved for future codification.

(7)

“Recipient” means a present or former recipient of medical assistance benefits.

(8)

“Request” means any inquiry by the Department or Division for the purpose of determining the existence of insurance where the Department or Division may have expended public assistance benefits.

(9)

“Subscriber” means the policyholder or covered person under the insurance policy.

Health insurers, and pharmacy benefit managers regulated as third-party administrators under Article 56 of Chapter 58 of the General Statutes, shall provide, with respect to a subscriber upon request of the Division or its authorized contractor, information to determine during what period the individual or the individual’s spouse or dependents may be (or may have been) covered by a health insurer and the nature of the coverage that is or was provided by the health insurer (including the subscriber’s name, address, identification number, social security number, date of birth and identifying number of the plan) in a manner prescribed by the Division or its authorized contractor. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, every health insurer shall provide, not more frequently than twelve times in a year and at no cost, to the Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, or the Department’s or Division’s authorized contractor, upon its request, information as necessary so that the Division may (i) identify applicants or recipients who may also be subscribers covered under the benefit plans of the health insurer; (ii) determine the period during which the individual, the individual’s spouse, or the individual’s dependents may be or may have been covered by the health benefit plan; and (iii) determine the nature of the coverage. To facilitate the Division or its authorized contractor in obtaining this and other related information, every health insurer shall:

Cooperate with the Division to determine whether a named individual who is a recipient of medical assistance may be covered under the insurer’s health benefit plan and eligible to receive benefits under the health benefit plan for services provided under the State Medical Assistance Plan.

Respond to the request for payment within 90 working days after receipt of written proof of loss or claim for payment for health care services provided to a recipient of medical assistance who is covered by the benefit plan of the health insurer.

Accept the Division’s right of recovery and the assignment to the Division of any right of an individual or other entity to payment from the party for an item or service for which payment has been made under the State Medical Assistance Plan.

Respond to any inquiry by the Division or its authorized contractor regarding a claim for payment for any health care item or service that is submitted not later than three years after the date of the provision of the health care item or service.

Notwithstanding subsection (d) of this section, agree not to deny a claim submitted by the Division solely on the basis of the date of submission of the claim, the type of format of the claim form, or a failure to present proper documentation at the point-of-sale that is the basis of the claim, if:

The claim is submitted by the Division within the three-year period beginning on the date on which the item or service was furnished; and

Any action by the Division to enforce its rights with respect to such claim is commenced within six years of the Division’s submission of the claim.

A health insurer that complies with this section shall not be liable on that account in any civil or criminal actions or proceedings.

A health insurer is obligated to reimburse the Department only if the insurer has a contractual obligation to make payment for the covered service or item.

History.

2006-66, s. 10.8; 2006-221, ss. 9(a)-(c); 2007-442, s. 2; 2019-81, s. 15(a).

§ 108A-55.5.
Eligibility monitoring for medical assistance.

On at least a quarterly basis, the Department shall review information concerning changes in circumstances that may affect medical assistance beneficiaries’ eligibility to receive medical assistance benefits. The Department shall share the information directly with, or make the information available to, the county department of social services that determined the beneficiary’s eligibility.

The information reviewed by the Department shall include all of the following:

Earned and unearned income.

Employment status and changes in employment.

Residency status.

Enrollment status in other State-administered public assistance programs.

Financial resources.

Incarceration status.

Death records.

Lottery winnings.

Enrollment status in public assistance programs outside of this State.

A county department of social services shall promptly review the information provided or made available by the Department in accordance with subsection (a) of this section to determine if the information indicates a change in circumstances that may affect a medical assistance beneficiary’s eligibility to receive medical assistance benefits and take one of the following actions:

If a review of the information does not result in the county department of social services finding a discrepancy or change in a beneficiary’s circumstances that may affect that beneficiary’s eligibility to receive medical assistance benefits, the county department of social services shall take no further action.

If a review of the information does result in the county department of social services finding a discrepancy or change in a beneficiary’s circumstances that may affect that beneficiary’s eligibility for medical assistance benefits, the county department of social services shall provide written notice to the beneficiary that describes in sufficient detail the circumstances of the discrepancy or change in circumstances that would affect the beneficiary’s eligibility for medical assistance benefits. The notice must include the following information:

The beneficiary will have 12 calendar days from the time of mailing to respond.

A response from the beneficiary must be in writing.

Self-declarations made by the beneficiary will not be accepted as verification of information in the response.

The consequences of taking no action.

After the expiration of 12 calendar days from the time of mailing the notice required under subsection (c) of this section, the county department of social services shall take one of the following actions:

If a beneficiary did not respond to the notice, the county department of social services shall redetermine the beneficiary’s eligibility for medical assistance benefits and provide the beneficiary with proper notice under

G.S. 108A-79

.

If a beneficiary responds to the notice and disagrees with the information in the notice, the county department of social services shall reinvestigate the matter and take one of the following actions:

If the county department of social services determines that there has been an error and the beneficiary’s eligibility to receive medical assistance benefits is not affected, then no further action shall be taken.

If the county department of social services determines that there is no error, the county department of social services shall redetermine the beneficiary’s eligibility for medical assistance benefits and provide the beneficiary with proper notice under

G.S. 108A-79

.

If a beneficiary responds to the notice and confirms the information in the notice is correct, then the county department of social services shall redetermine the beneficiary’s eligibility for medical assistance benefits and provide the beneficiary with proper notice under G.S. 108A-79.If, at any time after receiving a beneficiary’s response to the notice, the county department of social services determines that there is a risk of fraud or misrepresentation or inadequate documentation, then the county department of social services may request additional documentation from the beneficiary.

Nothing in this section shall preclude the Department or any county department of social services from receiving or reviewing additional information related to a beneficiary’s eligibility for medical assistance benefits that is obtained in a manner other than that provided for under this section.

History.

2017-57, s. 11H.20(a).

§ 108A-56.
Acceptance of federal grants.

All of the provisions of the federal Social Security Act providing grants to the states for medical assistance are accepted and adopted, and the provisions of this Part shall be liberally construed to effectuate compliance with the act, except to the extent the applicability of federal law or rules have been waived by agreement between the State and the U.S. Department of Health and Human Services. Nothing in this Part or the regulations made under its authority shall be construed to deprive a recipient of assistance of the right to choose the licensed provider of the care or service made available under this Part within the provisions of the federal Social Security Act, or valid waiver agreement. This section shall not be construed to prohibit a PHP from (i) requiring its enrollees to obtain services from providers that are under contract with the PHP or (ii) imposing utilization management criteria to a request for services, to the extent these actions are not otherwise prohibited by State or federal law or regulation, or by the Department.

History.

1965, c. 1173, s. 1; 1969, c. 546, s. 1; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 2019-81, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2019-81, s. 4, effective October 1, 2019, rewrote the first sentence, added “or valid waiver agreement” at the end of the second sentence and added the third sentence.

§ 108A-57.
Subrogation rights; withholding of information a misdemeanor.

As used in this section, the term “beneficiary” means (i) the beneficiary of medical assistance, including a minor beneficiary, (ii) the medical assistance beneficiary’s parent, legal guardian, or personal representative, (iii) the medical assistance beneficiary’s heirs, and (iv) the administrator or executor of the medical assistance beneficiary’s estate.Notwithstanding any other provisions of the law, to the extent of payments under this Part, the State shall be subrogated to all rights of recovery, contractual or otherwise, of a beneficiary against any person. Any claim brought by a medical assistance beneficiary against a third party shall include a claim for all medical assistance payments for health care items or services furnished to the medical assistance beneficiary as a result of the injury or action, hereinafter referred to as the “Medicaid claim.” Any claim brought by a medical assistance beneficiary against a third party that does not state the Medicaid claim shall be deemed to include the Medicaid claim. If the beneficiary has claims against more than one third party related to the same injury, then any amount received in payment of the Medicaid claim related to that injury shall reduce the total balance of the Medicaid claim applicable to subsequent recoveries related to that injury.

(a1)

If the amount of the Medicaid claim does not exceed one-third of the medical assistance beneficiary’s gross recovery, it is presumed that the gross recovery includes compensation for the full amount of the Medicaid claim. If the amount of the Medicaid claim exceeds one-third of the medical assistance beneficiary’s gross recovery, it is presumed that one-third of the gross recovery represents compensation for the Medicaid claim.

(a2)

A medical assistance beneficiary may dispute the presumptions established in subsection (a1) of this section by applying to the court in which the medical assistance beneficiary’s claim against the third party is pending, or if there is none, then to a court of competent jurisdiction in this State, for a determination of the portion of the beneficiary’s gross recovery that represents compensation for the Medicaid claim. An application under this subsection shall be filed with the court and served on the Department pursuant to the Rules of Civil Procedure no later than 30 days after the date that the settlement agreement is executed by all parties and, if required, approved by the court, or in cases in which judgment has been entered, no later than 30 days after the date of entry of judgment. The court shall hold an evidentiary hearing no sooner than 60 days after the date the action was filed. All of the following shall apply to the court’s determination under this subsection:

The medical assistance beneficiary has the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence that the portion of the beneficiary’s gross recovery that represents compensation for the Medicaid claim is less than the portion presumed under subsection (a1) of this section.

The presumption arising under subsection (a1) of this section is not rebutted solely by the fact that the medical assistance beneficiary was not able to recover the full amount of all claims.

If the beneficiary meets its burden of rebutting the presumption arising under subsection (a1) of this section, then the court shall determine the portion of the recovery that represents compensation for the Medicaid claim and shall order the beneficiary to pay the amount so determined to the Department in accordance with subsection (a5) of this section. In making this determination, the court may consider any factors that it deems just and reasonable.

If the beneficiary fails to rebut the presumption arising under subsection (a1) of this section, then the court shall order the beneficiary to pay the amount presumed pursuant to subsection (a1) of this section to the Department in accordance with subsection (a5) of this section.

(a3)

Notwithstanding the presumption arising pursuant to subsection (a1) of this section, the medical assistance beneficiary and the Department may reach an agreement on the portion of the recovery that represents compensation for the Medicaid claim. If such an agreement is reached after an application has been filed pursuant to subsection (a2) of this section, a stipulation of dismissal of the application signed by both parties shall be filed with the court.

(a4)

Within 30 days of receipt of the proceeds of a settlement or judgment related to a claim described in subsection (a) of this section, the medical assistance beneficiary or any attorney retained by the beneficiary shall notify the Department of the receipt of the proceeds.

(a5)

The medical assistance beneficiary or any attorney retained by the beneficiary shall, out of the proceeds obtained by or on behalf of the beneficiary by settlement with, judgment against, or otherwise from a third party by reason of injury or death, distribute to the Department the amount due pursuant to this section as follows:

(1)

If, upon the expiration of the time for filing an application pursuant subsection (a2) of this section, no application has been filed, then the amount presumed pursuant to subsection (a1) of this section, as prorated with the claims of all others having medical subrogation rights or medical liens against the amount received or recovered, shall be paid to the Department within 30 days of the beneficiary’s receipt of the proceeds, in the absence of an agreement pursuant to subsection (a3) of this section.

(2)

If an application has been filed pursuant to subsection (a2) of this section and no agreement has been reached pursuant to subsection (a3) of this section, then the Department shall be paid as follows:

If the beneficiary rebuts the presumption arising under subsection (a1) of this section, then the amount determined by the court pursuant to subsection (a2) of this section, as prorated with the claims of all others having medical subrogation rights or medical liens against the amount received or recovered, shall be paid to the Department within 30 days of the entry of the court’s order.

If the beneficiary fails to rebut the presumption arising under subsection (a1) of this section, then the amount presumed pursuant to subsection (a1) of this section, as prorated with the claims of all others having medical subrogation rights or medical liens against the amount received or recovered, shall be paid to the Department within 30 days of the entry of the court’s order.

(3)

If an agreement has been reached pursuant to subsection (a3) of this section, then the agreed amount, as prorated with the claims of all others having medical subrogation rights or medical liens against the amount received or recovered, shall be paid to the Department within 30 days of the execution of the agreement by the medical assistance beneficiary and the Department.

(a6)

The United States and the State of North Carolina shall be entitled to shares in each net recovery by the Department under this section. Their shares shall be promptly paid under this section and their proportionate parts of such sum shall be determined in accordance with the matching formulas in use during the period for which assistance was paid to the recipient.

It is a Class 1 misdemeanor for any person seeking or having obtained assistance under this Part for himself or another to willfully fail to disclose to the county department of social services or its attorney and to the Department the identity of any person or organization against whom the recipient of assistance has a right of recovery, contractual or otherwise.

This section applies to the administration of and claims payments under the NC Health Choice Program established under Part 8 of this Article.

As required to ensure compliance with this section, the Department may apply to the court in which the medical assistance beneficiary’s claim against the third party is pending, or if there is none, then to a court of competent jurisdiction in this State for enforcement of this section.

History.

1973, c. 476, s. 138; c. 1031, s. 1; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1312, ss. 1, 2; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1987 (Reg. Sess., 1988), c. 1022; 1993, c. 539, s. 815; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1996, 2nd Ex. Sess., c. 18, s. 24.2(a); 2009-16, s. 4(c); 2013-274, s. 1; 2017-57, s. 11H.23; 2018-5, s. 11H.6(a); 2019-240, s. 11(a).

§ 108A-57.1.
Rules governing transfer of medical assistance benefits between counties.

Any recipient of medical assistance who moves from one county to another county of this State shall continue to receive medical assistance if eligible. The county director of social services of the county from which the recipient has moved shall transfer all necessary records relating to the recipient to the county director of social services of the county to which the recipient has moved. The county from which the recipient has moved shall pay the county portion of the nonfederal share of medical assistance payments paid for services provided to the recipient during the month following the recipient’s move. Thereafter, the county to which the recipient has moved shall pay the county portion of the nonfederal share of medical assistance payments paid for the services provided to the recipient.

History.

1998-212, s. 12.6.

§ 108A-58.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2006-66, s. 10.5(a), effective July 1, 2006.

§ 108A-58.1.
Ineligibility for medical assistance based on transferring assets for less than fair market value.

General Rule. — Except as otherwise provided herein, an individual who is otherwise eligible to receive medical assistance under this Part is ineligible for Medicaid coverage and payment for the services specified in subsection (d) during the period specified in subsection (c) if the individual or the individual’s spouse transfers an asset for less than fair market value on or after the “lookback date” specified in subsection (b).

Lookback Date. —

Except as otherwise provided herein, the lookback date is the date specified in 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c)(1)(B).

Notwithstanding subdivision (1), the lookback date with respect to the medical services specified in subdivision (d)(2) is the date specified in 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c)(1)(B) or February 1, 2003, whichever is later.

Penalty Period. — The penalty period for the transfer of assets for less than fair market value is the period specified in 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c)(1)(D), (E), and (H).

Medical Services. —

In the case of an institutionalized individual, the transfer of assets penalty applies with respect to nursing facility services, a level of care in any institution equivalent to that of nursing facility services, and to home- or community-based services furnished under the State’s Community Alternatives Program waiver pursuant to 42 U.S.C. § 1396n(c) or (d), and pursuant to the hardship waiver under subsection (k) of this section.

In the case of a noninstitutionalized individual, the transfer of assets penalty applies with respect to home health services and personal care services as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(a)(7) and (24) and, to the extent permitted by federal law, such other long-term care services specified by rules adopted by the Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to subsection (k) of this section.

Assets. — Assets are the income and resources of an individual or the individual’s spouse (including the individual’s or spouse’s home) as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(h) and 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c)(1)(G), (I), and (J).

Fair Market Value and Uncompensated Value. —

The fair market value of an asset is the value (minus any valid and legally enforceable liens, mortgages, and encumbrances against the asset) that would have been received if the asset had been sold for good and valuable consideration at the prevailing market price at the time the asset was transferred. In the case of real or personal property that is taxable under Subchapter II of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes, there is a rebuttable presumption that the fair market value of the property is its most recent value as ascertained under Subchapter II of Chapter 105 of the General Statutes (minus any valid and legally enforceable liens, mortgages, and encumbrances against the property).

The uncompensated value of an asset is its fair market value minus the amount of good and valuable consideration received in exchange for the asset’s transfer.

Individual. — An individual is a person who applies for or is receiving medical assistance under this Part regardless of whether the person was, at the time an asset was transferred, a Medicaid applicant or recipient. The term “individual” also includes an individual’s legal representative, anyone acting at the individual’s direction or request, and any person, agency, or court acting lawfully on behalf of the individual.

Institutionalized and Noninstitutionalized Individuals. —

An institutionalized individual is an individual who meets the criteria set forth in 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(h)(3), regardless of whether the individual was institutionalized at the time an asset was transferred.

A noninstitutionalized individual is any individual who (i) is not an institutionalized individual, (ii) is an aged, blind, or disabled person who is categorically or medically needy pursuant to 42 C.F.R. § 120 Subpart B, C, or D or a qualified Medicare beneficiary as defined in 42 U.S.C. § 1396d(p)(1), and (iii) is not eligible for medical assistance under this Part based on his or her eligibility for an optional State supplement pursuant to 42 C.F.R. § 435.232.

Exceptions. —

This section does not apply if an individual establishes by the greater weight of the evidence that the transfer was exclusively for some purpose other than establishing or retaining eligibility for medical assistance under this Part.

This section does not apply to any transfer specified in 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c)(2)(A), (B), (C)(i), or (C)(iii).

Application to Life Estates and Income Producing Real Property. — The Department of Health and Human Services may apply federal transfer of assets policies in accordance with this section to (i) life estates purchased by or on behalf of the recipient, and (ii) to real property excluded as “income producing”, tenancy-in-common, or as nonhomesite property made “income producing.” The Department shall exclude from countable resources any life estate in real property that is in the recipient’s home and is measured by the recipient’s life. Federal transfer of assets policies applied to income producing real property shall become effective not earlier than October 1, 2001. Federal transfer of assets policies applied to real property excluded as tenancy-in-common, or as nonhomesite property made income producing in accordance with this subsection, shall become effective not earlier than October 1, 2005.

Hardship Waiver. — The Department of Health and Human Services shall waive a transfer of assets penalty that has been imposed or is imposable under this section if the Department determines that imposition of the penalty would create an undue hardship.

Rules and Compliance with Federal Law. —

This section shall be interpreted and administered consistently with governing federal law, including 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c).

The Department of Health and Human Services shall determine and publish at least annually the average monthly cost of nursing facility services for private patients that will be used in determining the length of a penalty period under this section.

The Department of Health and Human Services shall provide for a hardship waiver process in accordance with 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c)(2)(D).

The Department of Health and Human Services may adopt administrative rules that are necessary and appropriate to implement this section or the requirements of 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c) or other federal laws governing the transfer of assets and Medicaid eligibility.

History.

2006-66, s. 10.5(b); 2006-221, ss. 8(a)-(c).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-221, S. 8(a)-(c), effective July 1, 2006, added “and pursuant to the hardship waiver under subsection (k) of this section” at the end of subdivision (b)(1); in subdivision (h)(2), inserted “Subpart B, C, or D” near the middle, and deleted “(3)” preceding “(iii) is not eligible”’ and deleted the former second sentence of subsection (j), which read: “The transfer of assets policy shall apply only to an institutionalized individual or the individual’s spouse, as defined in subsection (h) of this section.”

§ 108A-58.2.
Waiver of transfer of assets penalty due to undue hardship.

Prior to imposition of a period of ineligibility for long-term care services because of an asset transfer, also known as a penalty period, the county department of social services shall notify the individual of the individual’s right to request a waiver of the penalty period because it will cause an undue hardship to the individual. The director of the county department of social services, or the director’s designee shall grant a waiver of the penalty period due to undue hardship if the individual meets the conditions set forth in subsection (e) of this section. As used in this section, “long term care services” are those services described in 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c)(1)(C)(i) and (ii).

When a Medicaid applicant who is requesting Medicaid to pay for institutional care requests a waiver of a penalty period due to undue hardship, the determination of whether to waive the penalty period shall be processed as part of the Medicaid application and is subject to the application processing standards set forth in 10A NCAC 23C.0201.

When an ongoing Medicaid recipient applies for institutional care or is receiving Medicaid payment for institutional care receives the notice described in subsection (a) of this section, the recipient has 12 calendar days from the date of the notice to request a waiver of the penalty due to undue hardship. The following are the procedures for processing the waiver request:

Within five work days of receipt of a request for a waiver of the transfer of assets penalty, the county department of social services shall notify the individual in writing of the information and documentation necessary to determine if the requirements for approving the undue hardship waiver are met.

The individual shall have 12 calendar days from the date of the notice specified in subdivision (1) of this subsection to provide the necessary information and documentation to establish the undue hardship.

If at the end of the first 12 calendar day period the necessary information and documentation has not been received by the county department of social services, the county department of social services shall again notify the individual of the necessary information and documentation. The individual shall be given an additional 12 calendar days to provide the information and documentation.

If the individual fails to request the undue hardship waiver within 12 calendar days from the date of the notice described in subsection (a) of this section, the county department of social services shall impose the transfer of assets penalty in accordance with notice requirements in

G.S. 108A-79

.

If by the end of the 12 calendar days from the notice described in subdivision (3) of this subsection, the necessary information and documentation has not been received by the county department of social services, the county department of social services shall deny the request for waiver of the penalty for undue hardship and notify the individual of the denial in accordance with

G.S. 108A-79

.

If by the end of the time allowed under subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection the county department of social services has received the necessary information and documentation, the county department of social services shall make a determination of whether the imposition of the penalty period would cause an undue hardship to the individual. The county department of social services shall complete the determination and notify the individual, pursuant to subsection (g) of this section, of whether the imposition of the penalty period will be waived due to undue hardship within 12 calendar days of the receipt of the necessary information and documentation.

If as part of the determination described in subdivision (6) of this subsection the county department of social services identifies the need for additional information and documentation, it shall notify the individual in writing of that information and documentation. This notice shall initiate a new period of time for the individual to provide the information and documentation as set forth in subdivisions (2) and (3) of this subsection. Within 12 calendar days of the receipt of the additional information and documentation, the county department of social services shall complete the determination and notify the individual, pursuant to subsection (g) of this section, of whether the imposition of the penalty period will be waived due to undue hardship.

As required by 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c)(2)(D), the facility in which an institutionalized individual is residing may request an undue hardship waiver on behalf of the institutionalized individual with the written consent of the individual or the personal representative of the individual. A facility applying for a waiver for an individual residing in the facility shall adhere to the requirements of this section but is not required to advance the costs of acquiring an attorney to aid the institutionalized individual.

Except as provided for in subsection (f) of this section, undue hardship exists if the imposition of the penalty period would deprive the individual of medical care, such that the individual’s health or life would be endangered, or of food, clothing, shelter, or other necessities of life. The individual must provide the information and documentation necessary to demonstrate to the director of the county department of social services or the director’s designee all of the following:

The individual currently has no alternative income or resources available to provide the medical care or food, clothing, shelter, or other necessities of life that the individual would be deprived of due to the imposition of the penalty.

The individual or some other person acting on the individual’s behalf is making a good faith effort to pursue all reasonable means to recover the transferred asset or the fair market value of the transferred asset, including any of the following:

Seeking the advice of an attorney and pursuing legal or equitable remedies such as asset freezing, assignment, or injunction.

a1.

Seeking modification, avoidance, or nullification of a financial instrument, promissory note, loan, mortgage or other property agreement, or other similar transfer agreement.

Cooperating with any attempt to recover the transferred asset or the fair market value of the transferred asset.

The following definitions apply in this subsection:

Health or life would be endangered. — A medical doctor with knowledge of the individual’s medical condition certifies in writing that in his or her professional opinion, the individual will be in danger of death or the individual’s health will suffer irreparable harm if a penalty period is imposed.

Recodified as sub-subdivision (e)(3)c1. of this section by Session Laws 2021-88, s. 9(a).

Income. — All income of the individual and the community spouse less a protected amount for the community spouse equal to the minimum monthly maintenance needs allowance as determined under 42 U.S.C. § 1396r-5(d), including in all circumstances the excess shelter allowance described under 42 U.S.C. § 1396r-5(d)(3)(A)(ii), without regard to any adjustment that would be made under 42 U.S.C. § 1396r-5(e), plus fifty percent (50%) of the income in excess of the protected amount.

c1.

Other necessities of life. — Includes basic, life sustaining utilities, including water, heat, electricity, phone, and other items or activities that without which the individual’s health or life would be endangered.

Resources. — All resources of the individual and of the community spouse except the homesite in which the individual or community spouse has an equity interest not exceeding five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000), a motor vehicle in which the individual or community spouse has an equity interest not exceeding thirty thousand dollars ($30,000), personal property, and, in the case of a community spouse, a portion of such other resources in an amount equal to the community spouse resource allowance as defined by 42 U.S.C. § 1396r-5(f)(2), so long as the amount does not exceed sixty percent (60%) of the maximum community spouse resource allowance as defined by 42 U.S.C. § 1396r-5(f)(2)(A)(ii). For purposes of this sub-subdivision, “homesite” means the principal place of residence of the individual or the community spouse in which the individual or community spouse has an equity interest.

An undue hardship does not exist when the application of a transfer of assets penalty merely causes the individual an inconvenience or restricts the individual’s lifestyle.

If the director of the county department of social services or the director’s designee determines that:

An undue hardship exists, the county department of social services shall waive the penalty period and notify the individual of approval of the waiver of the penalty in accordance with

G.S. 108A-79

.

An undue hardship does not exist, the county department of social services shall deny the request for the waiver of the penalty and notify the individual of denial of the waiver request in accordance with

G.S. 108A-79

.

During a penalty period that has been waived because of undue hardship, acquisition by the individual of new or increased income or resources shall be treated as a change in situation and evaluated pursuant to the rules adopted by the Department of Health and Human Services.

While the determination on a request for a waiver of the penalty period due to undue hardship is pending, Medicaid shall not make payments for services in a nursing facility or in an intermediate care facility for individuals with intellectual disabilities to hold a bed for the individual, as described in 42 U.S.C. § 1396p(c)(2)(D). However, if the individual is institutionalized and receiving Medicaid payment for services, Medicaid will maintain the same level of services until the last day of the month after the latter of the following:

Expiration of the 10 workday period following the notice required by

G.S. 108A-79

.

The date of the decision of a local appeal hearing described in

G.S. 108A-79

is issued if the individual requests an appeal of the imposition of a transfer of assets penalty period within the 10 workday period described in subdivision (1) of subsection (i) of this section.

History.

2007-442, s. 3(a); 2021-62, s. 4.1; 2021-88, ss. 9(a), (b).

§ 108A-59.
Acceptance of medical assistance constitutes assignment to the State of right to third party benefits; recovery procedure.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of the law, by accepting medical assistance, the recipient shall be deemed to have made an assignment to the State of the right to third party benefits, contractual or otherwise, to which he may be entitled.It shall be the responsibility of the county attorney of the county from which the medical assistance benefits are received or an attorney retained by that county and/or the State to enforce this subsection, and said attorney shall be compensated for his services in accordance with the attorneys’ fee arrangements approved by the Department of Health and Human Services.

The responsible State agency will establish a third party resources collection unit that is adequate to assure maximum collection of third party resources.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, in all actions brought pursuant to subsection (a) of this section to obtain reimbursement for payments for medical services, liability shall be determined on the basis of the same laws and standards, including bases for liability and applicable defenses, as would be applicable if the action were brought by the individual on whose behalf the medical services were rendered.

History.

1977, c. 664; 1979, 2nd Sess., c. 1312, ss. 3-5; 1981, c. 275, s. 1; 1995, c. 508, s. 2; 1997-443, s. 11A.118(a).